Idaho, session 2025, H0242.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 14, Title 54, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 54-1411A, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
54-1411A. PRECEPTORS -- CONTINUING EDUCATION. (1) In order to promote
preceptorship experiences, a primary care health professional applying to
renew a professional license pursuant to section 54-1411, Idaho Code, shall
track and report any hours spent acting as a preceptor to a graduate student
in a qualified rural area during the prior two (2) years. A preceptor devot-
ing three hundred sixty (360) hours or more during the prior two (2) years in
a qualified rural area shall receive credit for such service in the form of
continuing education credits or required practice hours or be accorded such
other affirmative acknowledgment as the board of nursing shall determine is
appropriate in considering the renewal of the preceptor's license.
(2) For the purpose of this section, the following definitions apply:
(a) "Graduate student" means an individual matriculating at the gradu-
ate level at any accredited Idaho institution of higher education seek-
ing a degree in any area of nursing licensed under this chapter.
(b) "Preceptor" means a nursing professional licensed pursuant to the
provisions of this chapter.
(c) "Preceptorship" means an uncompensated mentoring experience in
which a preceptor provides a program of personalized instruction,
training, and supervision for a total of no less than one hundred eighty
(180) hours per calendar year that is offered to eligible graduate stu-
dents to enable the students to obtain professional degrees in primary
care fields.
(d) "Primary care" shall have the meaning as provided in section
39-5903, Idaho Code.
(e) "Qualified rural area" means a primary care health professional
shortage area or a medically underserved area, as those terms are de-
fined in section 39-5903, Idaho Code.


SECTION 2. That Chapter 18, Title 54, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 54-1808A, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
54-1808A. PRECEPTORS -- CONTINUING EDUCATION. (1) In order to promote
preceptorship experiences, a primary care health professional applying to
renew a professional license as a physician or physician assistant shall
track and report any hours spent acting as a preceptor to a graduate student
in a qualified rural area during the prior two (2) years. A preceptor devot-
ing three hundred sixty (360) hours or more during the prior two (2) years in
a qualified rural area shall receive credit for such service in the form of
continuing medical education credits or be accorded such other affirmative
acknowledgment as the board of medicine shall determine is appropriate in
considering the renewal of the preceptor's license.
(2) For the purpose of this section, the following definitions apply:
(a) "Graduate student" means an individual matriculating at the gradu-
ate level at any accredited Idaho institution of higher education seek-
ing a degree in any of the areas of doctor of osteopathy or physician as-
sistant.
(b) "Preceptor" means a physician or physician assistant licensed pur-
suant to the provisions of this chapter.
(c) "Preceptorship" means an uncompensated mentoring experience in
which a preceptor provides a program of personalized instruction,
training, and supervision for a total of no less than one hundred eighty
(180) hours per calendar year that is offered to eligible graduate stu-
dents to enable the students to obtain professional degrees in primary
care fields.
(d) "Primary care" shall have the meaning as provided in section
39-5903, Idaho Code.
(e) "Qualified rural area" means a primary care health professional
shortage area or a medically underserved area, as those terms are de-
fined in section 39-5903, Idaho Code.
SECTION 3. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.